Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.186

Employee performance evaluations—Termination of employment—Rules.

The director shall adopt rules designed to terminate the state employment of any employee whose performance is so inadequate as to warrant termination.

[ 2002 c 354 s 215; 1993 c 281 s 32; 1985 c 461 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Severability—1985 c 461: See note following RCW 41.06.020.